Wyoming, session 2025, HB0128.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-4-116 is created to read:

35-4-116. Declaration of a public health emergency.
HB0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0237

The governor shall declare when a public health emergency
exists or has ended. After the governor declares that a
public health emergency exists, the governor shall by
proclamation convene the legislature on the second day
following the date of the declaration for purposes of
concurring with or not concurring with the existence of a
public health emergency. The legislature by joint
resolution may concur that a public health emergency exists
or shall have the authority to terminate the public health
emergency. The legislature shall meet at the seat of
government and may satisfy quorum requirements and vote in
person or remotely by electronic video or audio conference
method.

Section 2. W.S. 1-1-141(a)(ii), 33-25-102(f)(vi),
33-49-107(c)(ii), 35-4-114(b) and (c) and 35-4-115(a)(i)
are amended to read:

1-1-141. COVID-19 exposure and illness; assumption of
the risk.

(a) As used in this section:
HB0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0237

(ii) "COVID-19" means severe acute respiratory
syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2) and any mutation or
viral fragments thereof or any disease or condition caused
by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2
(SARS-CoV-2) that was the subject of the public health
emergency declared by the governor under W.S.
35-4-115(a)(i) on March 13, 2020;

33-25-102. Practice of physical therapy; license or
certificate required; exceptions; false representations.

(f) The following persons are exempt from the
licensure and certification requirements of this act:

(vi) A physical therapist licensed in another
jurisdiction who enters this state to provide physical
therapy during a public health emergency as declared by the
governor pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i) 35-4-116. Any
physical therapist practicing pursuant to this paragraph
shall notify the board of the therapist's intent to
practice and supply additional information as provided by
rules of the board;
HB0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0237

33-49-107. Licensure required; components;
exemptions; other licensed health care professionals.

(c) The following persons are exempt from this
chapter's licensure requirements:

(ii) An acupuncturist licensed in another
jurisdiction who enters this state to provide acupuncture
during a natural disaster or a public health emergency, as
declared by the governor pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i)
35-4-116;

35-4-114. Immunity from liability.

(b) The licensing boards for any health care provider
holding a permit or license as a health care provider
regulated under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes shall
provide by rule and regulations for the temporary licensure
of health care providers during a public health emergency
as declared by the governor pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i)
35-4-116. If necessary during a declared public health
emergency, the state health officer may issue temporary
HB0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0237
practice licenses to health care providers who are retired,
who have an inactive license or who are licensed in another
state without a valid Wyoming license pending action on an
application for issuance of a temporary license by the
appropriate licensing board pursuant to this subsection.

(c) All temporary health care provider licenses
issued by the state health officer under subsection (b) of
this section shall terminate automatically upon declaration
by the governor, pursuant to W.S. 35-4-115(a)(i) 35-4-116,
that the public health emergency has ended.

35-4-115. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Public health emergency" means an
occurrence or imminent threat of an illness or health
condition caused by an epidemic or pandemic disease, a
novel and highly fatal infectious agent or a biological
toxin that poses a substantial risk of a significant number
of human fatalities or incidents of permanent or long-term
HB0128

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0237
disability;. The governor shall declare when a public
health emergency exists or has ended;

Section 3. This act shall apply to all declarations
of public health emergencies occurring on and after July 1,
2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0128